Utah statutes.
32A-6-104.   Duties of commission and department before issuing permits.
(1)  Before any special use permit is issued by the commission, the department
shall conduct an investigation for the purpose of gathering information and
making recommendations to the commission as to the issuance of the permit.
The information shall be forwarded to the commission to aid in its
determination.
(2)  Before issuing any special use permit, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements for making application for a permit, as provided by Sections
32A-6-102 and  32A-6-103, and that the application is complete;
(b)  consider the applicant's ability to properly utilize the special use
permit within the restrictions of this title and the commission rules
including, but not limited to, the proposed use of the permit, and the nature
and type of organization making use of the permit;
(c)  consider the physical characteristics of the premises where alcoholic
products are proposed to be stored, used, mixed, or sold, such as the
condition of the premises, public visibility, and safety considerations;
(d)  consider specific factors or circumstances regarding the specific type of
permit sought by the applicant;
(e)  approve of the location and equipment utilized by the applicant to
distill alcohol for experimental testing purposes or use as a fuel; and
(f)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.
